Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
operations ................................. $ 57,787,553
(2) Public university operations
and student support
for distribution to
public universities..................... $900,000,000
(3) Community College Support
Fund for distribution to
community colleges and
community college service
districts and school
districts..................................... $703,042,563
(4) Oregon Opportunity Grants ...... $166,425,084
(5) Oregon Promise grants ............. $ 42,234,401
(6) Oregon National Guard
tuition assistance ...................... $ 4,220,230
(7) Oregon Health and Science
University education and
other programs ......................... $ 82,479,478
(8) Public university statewide
programs................................... $156,035,459
(9) Statewide public services .......... $ 52,614,889
(10) Debt service and related costs:
(a) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 1
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities..................... $212,664,808
(b) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ................... $ 37,067,144
(c) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon Health and Science
University ................................. $ 23,570,250
(d) Repayment of energy loans made
to Oregon public universities
by the State Department of
Energy....................................... $ 13,119,216
(e) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities ........ $ 992,525
(f) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon community colleges ...... $ 122,517
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$36,940,110 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$13,379,130 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon community colleges.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$12,274,716 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Education  Stability Fund to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$49,418,728 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission to the Outdoor
School Education Fund.
SECTION 5a.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of
$16,514,607 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from lottery moneys
allocated to the Sports Lottery Account.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds and funds described in sections 8 to 12 of this 2021
Act, collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 2
related grants ........................... $ 77,211,231
(2) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
Health and Science University .. $ 30,869,380
(3) Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 4,101,340
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$130,656,715 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding  federal funds described in section 10 of
this 2021 Act, collected or received by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for
Higher Education Coordinating Commission programs and related grants.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $70,563
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from  the moneys received
from the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax  Fund and the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund for the Community College Support Fund.
SECTION 9.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Higher Educa-
tion Coordinating Commission for debt service on general  obligation bonds and certificates
of participation issued for the benefit of public universities and  Oregon Health and Science
University and paid with resources received from the public universities and Oregon Health
and Science University are not limited.
SECTION 10. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for payments  to individuals, organizations or units of gov-
ernment from federal National Emergency Grants funds are not limited.
SECTION 11. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on Build  America Bonds sold for the benefit
of public universities and community colleges are not limited.
SECTION 12. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission of moneys from the Tuition Protection Fund are not limited.
SECTION 13. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 4